South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S913.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 9, Chapter 1, Title 1 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 1-1-687. "Carolina Until I Die" by Patrick Davis is designated as an official state song. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----